North Carolina statutes. Chapter 128. Offices and Public Officers.
Article 3. Retirement System for Counties, Cities and Towns.

§ 128-21.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in this Article, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Accumulated contribution” shall mean the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his individual account in the annuity savings fund, together with regular interest thereon, as provided in

G.S. 128-30

, subsection (b).

“Actuarial equivalent” shall mean a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of actuarial assumptions as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees.

“Annuity” shall mean payments for life derived from the accumulated contribution of a member. All annuities shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

“Annuity reserve” shall mean the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of any annuity computed at regular interest upon the basis of such mortality tables as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees.

(4a)

“Authorized representatives who are assisting the Retirement Systems Division staff” means only other staff of the Department of State Treasurer, staff of the Department of Justice, or persons providing internal auditing assistance required under G.S. 143-746(b).

“Average final compensation” shall mean the average annual compensation, not including any terminal payments for unused sick leave, of a member during the four consecutive calendar years of creditable service producing the highest such average; but shall not include any compensation, as determined by the Board of Trustees, for the reimbursement of expenses or payments for housing or any other allowances whether or not classified as salary and wages. Payout of vacation leave shall be included in “average final compensation” only if the payout is received by the member during the four consecutive calendar years of membership service producing the highest average annual compensation of the member.

“Beneficiary” shall mean any person in receipt of a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided by this Article.

“Board of Trustees” shall mean the Board provided for in

G.S. 128-28

to administer the Retirement System.

“Compensation” shall mean all salaries and wages prior to any reduction pursuant to sections 125, 401(k), 403(b), 414(h)(2), and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, not including any terminal payments for unused sick leave, derived from public funds which are earned by a member of the Retirement System for service as an employee in the unit of the Retirement System for which he is performing full-time work. In addition to the foregoing, “compensation” shall include:

Performance-based compensation (regardless of whether paid in a lump sum, periodic installments, or on a monthly basis);

Conversion of additional benefits to salary (additional benefits such as health, life, or disability plans), so long as the benefits are other than mandated by State law or regulation;

Payment of tax consequences for benefits provided by the employer so long as they constitute an adjustment or increase in salary and not a “reimbursement of expenses”;

Payout of vacation leave so long as such payouts are permitted by applicable law and regulation;

Employee contributions to eligible deferred compensation plans; and

Effective July 1, 2009, payment of military differential wages.

“Compensation” shall not include any payment, as determined by the Board of Trustees, for the reimbursement of expenses or payments for housing or any other allowances whether or not classified as salary and wages. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, “compensation” shall not include:

Supplement/allowance provided to employee to purchase additional benefits such as health, life, or disability plans;

Travel supplement/allowance (nonaccountable allowance plans);

Employer contributions to eligible deferred compensation plans;

Employer-provided fringe benefits (additional benefits such as health, life, or disability plans);

Reimbursement of uninsured medical expenses;

Reimbursement of business expenses;

Reimbursement of moving expenses;

Reimbursement/payment of personal expenses;

Incentive payments for early retirement;

Bonuses paid incident to retirement;

Contract buyout/severance payments; and

Payouts for unused sick leave.

In the event an employer reports as “compensation” payments not specifically included or excluded as “compensation”, such payments shall be “compensation” for retirement purposes only if the employer pays the Retirement System the additional actuarial liability created by such payments.

(7b)

“Compliance investigation” means an independent review or examination by Retirement Systems Division staff or authorized representatives who are assisting the Retirement Systems Division staff of records, activities, actions, or decisions by employers or other affiliated or associated entities having an impact on a Retirement System or benefits administered by the Board of Trustees. The purpose of a compliance investigation is to help detect errors and ensure compliance and full accountability in the use of pension funds.

(7c)

“Consumer Price Index” shall mean the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, all items, not seasonally adjusted, standard reference base, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor.

“Creditable service” shall mean the total of “prior service” plus “membership service” plus service, both noncontributory and purchased, for which credit is allowable as provided in

G.S. 128-26

. In no event, however, shall “creditable service” be deemed “membership service” for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits accruing under this Chapter.

(8a)

“Duly acknowledged” means notarized, including electronic notarization, or verified through an identity authentication service approved by the Department of State Treasurer.

“Earnable compensation” shall mean the full rate of the compensation that would be payable to an employee if he worked the full normal working time, including any allowance of maintenance or in lieu thereof received by the member.

“Employee” shall mean any person who is regularly employed in the service of and whose salary or compensation is paid by the employer as defined in subdivision (11) of this section, whether employed or appointed for stated terms or otherwise, except teachers in the public schools and except such employees who hold office by popular election as are not required to devote a major portion of their time to the duties of their office. “Employee” also means all full-time, paid firemen who are employed by any fire department that serves a city or county or any part of a city or county and that is supported in whole or in part by municipal or county funds. “Employee” also includes any participant whose employment is interrupted by reason of service in the Uniformed Services, as that term is defined in section 4303(16) of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, Public Law 103-353, if that participant was an employee at the time of the interruption; if the participant does not return immediately after that service to employment with a covered employer in this System, then the participant shall be deemed “in service” until the date on which the participant was first eligible to be separated or released from his or her involuntary military service. In all cases of doubt the Board of Trustees shall decide who is an employee. On and after August 1, 2001, a person who is a nonimmigrant alien and who otherwise meets the requirements of this subdivision shall not be excluded from the definition of “employee” solely because the person holds a temporary or time-limited visa.

“Employer” shall mean any county, incorporated city or town, the board of alcoholic control of any county or incorporated city or town, the North Carolina League of Municipalities, and the State Association of County Commissioners. “Employer” shall also mean any separate, juristic political subdivision of the State as may be approved by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the Attorney General.

(11a)

“Filing” when used in reference to an application for retirement shall mean the receipt of an acceptable application on a form provided by the Retirement System.

(11b)

“Firefighter” means a person (i) who is a full-time paid employee of an employer that participates in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System and maintains a fire department certified by the North Carolina Department of Insurance and (ii) who is actively serving in a position with assigned primary duties and responsibilities for the prevention, detection, and suppression of fire.

(11c)

“Fraud investigation” means an independent review or examination by Retirement Systems Division staff or authorized representatives who are assisting the Retirement Systems Division staff of records, activities, actions, or decisions by employers or other affiliated or associated entities having an impact on the Retirement System. The purpose of a fraud investigation is to help detect and prevent fraud and to ensure full accountability in the use of pension funds.

(11d)

“Law Enforcement Officer” means a full-time paid employee of an employer, who possesses the power of arrest, who has taken the law enforcement oath administered under the authority of the State as prescribed by

G.S. 11-11

, and who is certified as a law enforcement officer under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes or certified as a deputy sheriff under the provisions of Chapter 17E of the General Statutes. “Law enforcement officer” also means the sheriff of the county. The number of paid personnel employed as law enforcement officers by a law enforcement agency may not exceed the number of law enforcement positions approved by the applicable local governing board.

“Medical board” shall mean the board of physicians provided for in

G.S. 128-28

, subsection (l).

“Member” shall mean any person included in the membership of the Retirement System as provided in

G.S. 128-24

.

“Membership service” shall mean service as an employee rendered while a member of the Retirement System or membership service in a North Carolina Retirement System that has been transferred into this system.

“Pension” shall mean payments for life derived from money provided by the employer. All pensions shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

“Pension reserve” shall mean the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of any pension computed at regular interest upon the basis of such mortality tables as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees.

“Prior service” shall mean the service of a member rendered before the date he becomes a member of the System, certified on his prior service certificate and allowable as provided by

G.S. 128-26

. No prior service shall be allowed at any employer for which participation is adopted and approved by the Board of Trustees in this Retirement System on or after August 1, 2015.

“Regular interest” shall mean interest compounded annually at such rate as shall be determined by the Board of Trustees in accordance with

G.S. 128-29

, subsection (b).

(18a)

“Regularly employed” shall mean employment in a position for which the duties require not less than 1,000 hours of work in a calendar year, provided that the term shall not include any individuals whose employment is considered “temporary employment” as defined in subdivision (22b) of this section or “statutorily-required interim employment” as defined in subdivision (22a) of this section.

(18b)

“Rescue squad worker” means a person (i) who is a full-time paid employee of an employer that participates in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System and maintains a rescue squad or emergency medical services team certified by the North Carolina Department of Insurance or the Department of Health and Human Services and (ii) who is actively serving in a position with assigned primary duties and responsibilities for the alleviation of human suffering and assistance to persons who are in difficulty, who are injured, or who become suddenly ill, by providing proper and efficient care or emergency medical services.

“Retirement” under this Article shall mean the commencement of monthly retirement benefits, along with the termination of employment and the complete separation from active service with no intent or agreement, expressed or implied, to return to service. A retirement allowance under the provisions of this Article may only be granted upon retirement of a member. In order for a member’s retirement to become effective in any month, the member must perform no work for a participating employer, including part-time, temporary, substitute, or contractor work, at any time during the same month immediately following the effective first day of retirement.

“Retirement allowance” shall mean the sum of the annuity and the pension, or any optional benefit payable in lieu thereof.

“Retirement System” shall mean the North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System as defined in this Article.

“Service” shall mean service as an employee as described in subdivision (10) of this section and paid for by the employer as described in subdivision (11) of this section.

(22a)

“Statutorily-required interim employment” shall mean individuals whose employment for an employer as defined in subdivision (11) of this section occurs as a result of the individual’s designation by the city council as an interim city manager, as provided in

G.S. 160A-150

for a period not to exceed 12 months on a nonrecurring basis, or as a result of the individual’s designation by the board of commissioners as an interim county manager, as provided in

G.S. 153A-84

for a period not to exceed 12 months on a nonrecurring basis.

(22b)

“Temporary employment” shall mean employment for a limited term, in no case to exceed 12 consecutive months on a nonrecurring basis, for an employer as defined in subdivision (11) of this section.

“Year” shall mean the regular fiscal year beginning July 1, and ending June 30; in the following calendar year unless otherwise defined by regulation of the Board of Trustees.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 1; 1941, c. 357, s. 1; 1943, c. 535; 1945, c. 526, s. 1; 1947, c. 833, ss. 1, 2; 1949, c. 231, ss. 1, 2; 1949, c. 1015; 1959, c. 491, ss. 1, 2; 1961, c. 515, s. 5; 1965, c. 781; 1971, c. 325, ss. 1-4; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 125; 1977, c. 316, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 557, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 479, s. 196(b); c. 649, s. 3; 1991, c. 51, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 762, ss. 1, 2; 1997-144, s. 1; 1999-167, ss. 1, 2; 1999-456, s. 37; 2001-426, s. 1; 2003-359, ss. 13, 14; 2009-66, ss. 2(a), 6(f), (j); 2011-92, s. 1; 2011-294, s. 4; 2012-185, s. 2(a); 2013-288, ss. 3(b), 4(b); 2014-97, s. 4(b); 2015-164, s. 8; 2015-168, s. 5; 2017-125, s. 1(b); 2017-128, s. 1(e), (f), (g); 2020-48, s. 1.1(a); 2021-75, s. 3.1(a).

Local Modification.

Catawba: 1995, c. 306, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 693, s. 2; Mecklenburg: 1995, c. 532, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 693, s. 1; city of Asheville: 1981, c. 737; city of Charlotte: 1947, c. 926, amended by Session Laws 1949, c. 734; 1951, c. 387; 1965, c. 575; 1969, c. 132; 1971, c. 860; c. 903, s. 2; 1973, c. 267; 1983, c. 506; (as to Art. 3) 1985, c. 185; 1987, c. 506; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1033; 1989, c. 248; c. 770, s. 45; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 830; c. 1030, s. 51.6; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 640, s.1; 1995, c. 171, s. 1; 1999-100, s. 1; 2001-22, 2002-43, ss. 1-5; 2006-117, s. 1, 2; 2010-7, s. 1; 2017-71, s. 1; (as to Article 3) city of Fayetteville: 1998-61; city of High Point: 1987, c. 327; town of Stovall: 2008-52, s. 1 (as to prior service credits).

Open Enrollment — Contributory Death Benefit.

Session Laws 2007-388, s. 1, provides: “Notwithstanding any section of law or any rules and regulations adopted by the Boards of Trustees to the contrary, the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer shall allow for an open enrollment period in the Contributory Death Benefit for Retired Members of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, and the Legislative Retirement System. This open enrollment period shall begin February 1, 2008, and end May 31, 2008. The Retirement Systems Division shall send notice by U.S. mail of the open enrollment period to all retirees who elected not to be covered under this benefit or who failed to make any election at the time of their retirement and shall send a second notice by U.S. mail to any such retiree who fails to make an election within 60 days of the notification of the open enrollment period. Notice, at minimum, shall consist of notification of the open enrollment period and the consequences of failure to respond within the specified time frames, informational materials explaining the benefit program and the associated costs, and a preprinted personalized enrollment application to facilitate the enrollment process indicating each individual retiree’s contribution rate. The contribution rate for retirees electing coverage during the open enrollment period shall be increased by eleven and one-tenth percent (11.1%) the rate established for retirees who elected coverage when first eligible, at retirement. For retirees electing coverage during this open enrollment period, coverage shall become effective the first of the month following the month in which the election of coverage is received by the Retirement Systems Division but not before February 1, 2008. Contribution rates for coverage shall be based upon the retiree’s nearest age as of the effective date of coverage and shall begin by deduction from the retiree’s net monthly retirement allowance in the month in which coverage becomes effective. Coverage elected by retirees during this open enrollment period shall be subject to all other laws and rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Trustees governing the Contributory Death Benefit for Retired Members.”

§ 128-22.
Name and date of establishment.

A Retirement System is hereby established and placed under the management of the Board of Trustees for the purpose of providing retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this Article for employees of those counties, cities and towns or other eligible employers participating in the said Retirement System. Following the filing of the application as provided in

G.S. 128-23(c)

, the Board shall set a date, effective the first day of a calendar quarter, not more than 90 days thereafter, as of which date participation of the employer may begin, which date shall be known as the date of participation for such employer: Provided, that in the judgment of the Board of Trustees an adequate number of persons have indicated their intention to participate; otherwise at such later date as the Board of Trustees may set.

This Retirement System is a governmental plan, within the meaning of Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. Therefore, the nondiscrimination rules of Sections 401(a)(5) and 401(a)(26) of the Code do not apply. This System shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the “North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System,” and by such name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds invested, and all of its cash and securities and other property held.

Consistent with Section 401(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, all contributions from participating employers and participating employees to this Retirement System shall be made to funds held in trust through trust instruments that have the purposes of distributing trust principal and income to retired members and their beneficiaries and of paying other definitely determinable benefits under this Chapter, after meeting the necessary expenses of administering this Retirement System. Neither the trust corpus nor income from this trust can be used for purposes other than the exclusive benefit of members or their beneficiaries, except that employer contributions made to the trust under a good faith mistake of fact may be returned to an employer, where the refund can occur within less than one year after the mistaken contribution was made, consistent with the rule adopted by the Board of Trustees. The Retirement System shall have a consolidated Plan document, consisting of Article V, Section 6(2) of the North Carolina Constitution, relevant statutory provisions in this Chapter, associated regulations in the North Carolina Administrative Code, substantive and procedural information on the official forms used by the Retirement System, and policies and minutes of the Board of Trustees.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 2; 1941, c. 357, s. 2; 1943, c. 535; 1945, c. 526, s. 2; 1959, c. 491, s. 3; 2012-130, s. 7(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-130, s. 7(b), effective July 1, 2012, inserted the first two sentences and substituted “This System” for “It” in the second paragraph and added the last paragraph.

State Government Reorganization.

The Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement system was transferred to the Department of State Treasurer by

G.S. 143A-35

, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864.

§ 128-23.
Acceptance by cities, towns and counties.

Pursuant to the favorable vote of a majority of the employees of any incorporated city or town, the governing body may, by resolution legally adopted and approved by the Board of Trustees, elect to have its employees become eligible to participate in the Retirement System, and the said municipal governing body may make the necessary appropriation therefor and if necessary levy annually taxes for payment of the same.

Pursuant to the favorable vote of a majority of the employees of the county, the board of commissioners of any county may, by resolution legally adopted and approved by the Board of Trustees, elect to have its employees become eligible to participate in the Retirement System. Each county is authorized to make appropriations for these purposes and to fund them by levy of property taxes as authorized by Article 7 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes and by the allocation of other revenues whose use is not otherwise restricted by law.

Any eligible employer desiring to participate in the Retirement System shall file with the Board of Trustees an application for participation under the conditions included in this Article on a form approved by the Board of Trustees. In such application the employer shall agree to make the contributions required of participating employers, to deduct from the salaries of employees who may become members the contributions required of members under this Article, and to transmit such contributions to the Board of Trustees. It shall also agree to make the employer’s contributions for the participation in the Retirement System of all employees entering the service of the employer, after its participation begins, who shall become members.

Such contributions as are made by employers shall be regarded as additions to the compensation of such employees as are members of the Retirement System and deducted therefrom for the purpose of making the employer’s contribution, in addition to the deduction from the compensation of employees on account of member contributions.

The agreement of such employer to contribute on account of its employees shall be irrevocable, but should an employer for any reason become financially unable to make the normal and accrued liability contributions payable on account of its employees, then such employer shall be deemed to be in temporary default. Such temporary default shall not relieve such employer from any liability for its contributions payable on account of its employees.Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the Retirement System shall not be liable for the payment of any pensions or other benefits on account of the employees or pensioners of any employer under this Article, for which reserves have not been previously created from funds contributed by such employer or its employees for such benefits.

Effective January 1, 1955, there shall be three classes of employers to be designated Class A, Class B and Class C, respectively. Each employer whose date of participation occurs before July 1, 1951, shall be a Class A employer unless such an employer by written notice filed with the Board of Trustees on or before June 30, 1951, elected to be a Class B employer. Each employer whose date of participation occurs on or after July 1, 1951, but before January 1, 1955, shall be a Class A employer. Each employer whose date of participation occurs on or after January 1, 1955, shall be a Class C employer.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Article, any employer who is not a participating employer and who employs law enforcement officers transferred from the Law Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System to this Retirement System on January 1, 1986, or who employs law enforcement officers electing to become members of this Retirement System on and after January 1, 1986, shall be employers participating in this Retirement System as this participation pertains to their law enforcement officers. The election of membership in this Retirement System shall be at the sole discretion of law enforcement officers of participating employers described in this subsection.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section,

G.S. 128-21(11)

, or any other provision of law to the contrary, any board of alcoholic control that is not a participating employer in the Retirement System on June 30, 2021, is not eligible to participate in the Retirement System.

History.

1939, c. 390, s. 3; 1951, c. 274, s. 1; 1955, c. 1153, s. 1; 1971, c. 325, s. 5; 1973, c. 803, s. 16; 1985, c. 479, s. 196(c); 1991, c. 585, s. 1; 2020-48, s. 1.14; 2021-59, s. 1.

§ 128-23.1.
Inactive employers.

An employer shall be considered an inactive employer if all of the following criteria are met:

The employer has no employees that qualify for membership in the Retirement System.

The employer has made no employer contributions for at least one month.

The employer makes a request in writing to the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer to be made inactive.

The Retirement Systems Division of the State Treasurer has reviewed the employer request to become inactive and has granted that request. The Retirement Systems Division shall provide written notification to the requesting employer of any decisions made under this section.

Not later than April 30 of each calendar year, the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer shall make a report to the Board on all employers who were determined to be inactive employers in that preceding calendar year.

History.

2020-48, s. 1.9(b).